Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 11 Disorderly Conduct

11-11-1.
Disturbance of public assemblies generally.

Every person who shall willfully interrupt or disturb any town or ward meeting, any assembly of people met for religious worship, any military funeral or memorial service, any public or private school, any meeting lawfully and peaceably held for purposes of moral, literary or scientific improvement, or any other lawful meeting, exhibition or entertainment, either within or without the place where the meeting or school is held, shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 278, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 344, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 396, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 607, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-11-1

; P.L. 2007, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 212, § 1.

11-11-2.
Use of dangerous or offensive instruments or substances to disturb public assemblies.

Any person who shall willfully place in, on, about, or upon any theater, motion picture house, hall, or other building or place where people are assembled for the purpose of entertainment or instruction, any substance or thing that does or is liable to interrupt and disturb the peace and order of that place, or is liable to interrupt, disturb, or throw into confusion or endanger the life and limb of persons assembled in that place, or which is liable to or does cause injury to the property of the owner, lessee, tenant, or other occupant of the theater, motion picture house, hall, or other building or place, or whoever willfully throws into, against or upon, or puts, places, and explodes or causes to be placed or exploded in or upon any theater, motion picture house, hall, or any other building or place of public assemblage, any bomb, torpedo, or other instrument or package loaded or filled with any explosive or offensive substance with intent unlawfully to destroy or injure the theater, motion picture house, hall, or other building or place of public assemblage, shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years, or shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 76; P.L. 1932, ch. 1921, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 86; G.L. 1956, §

11-11-2

.

11-11-3.
Carrying on business or entertainment in vicinity of religious meeting.

Whenever any religious society shall hold any camp, tent, grove or other out-door meeting, or the Society of General Six-principle Baptists of Rhode Island and Massachusetts shall hold their annual “general meeting,” for any purpose connected with the object for which the religious society was organized, no person, without the consent of the religious society or of its proper officers, shall keep in any shop, tent, booth, wagon or carriage or other place, for sale, or expose for sale any spirituous or intoxicating liquors or other drinks or food or merchandise of any kind, or hawk or peddle any liquors or merchandise mentioned in this section within one mile of the place of the meeting, nor shall any person engage in gaming, horse racing, or exhibit or offer to exhibit any show or play within the like distance of one mile of a meeting; and every person violating any provision of this section shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) nor less than five dollars ($5.00) or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall be so construed as to prevent innkeepers, grocers, or other persons from pursuing their ordinary business at their usual place of doing business, nor to prevent any person from selling victuals in his or her usual place of abode.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 121, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 147, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 152, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 607, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

11-11-3

.

11-11-4.
Prevention from carrying on employment.

Every person who, by himself or herself or in concert with other persons, shall attempt by force, violence, threats or intimidation of any kind to prevent, or who shall prevent, any other person from entering upon and pursuing any employment, upon any terms and conditions as that person may think proper, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) or be imprisoned not exceeding ninety (90) days.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 278, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 344, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 396, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 607, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

11-11-4

.

11-11-5.
Profanity.

Every person who shall be guilty of profane swearing and cursing shall be fined not exceeding five dollars ($5.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 281, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 347, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

11-11-5

.

11-11-6.
Repealed.

11-11-7.
Overcrowded assembly.

The occupant load permitted in any assembly building structure, or portion of it, shall be determined by dividing the net floor area or space assigned to that use by the square feet per occupant as follows:

An assembly area of concentrated use without fixed seats such as an auditorium, gymnasium, church, chapel, dance floor, and lodge room, seven square feet (7 sq. ft.) per person.

An assembly area of less concentrated use such as conference rooms, dining room, drinking establishments, exhibit room, or lounge, fifteen square feet (15 sq. ft.) per person.

Standing room or waiting space, five square feet (5 sq. ft.) per person; provided, that aisle area, except rear cross aisles, shall not be considered in determining the number of standing patrons allowed.

Any residential structure, or portion of it, that is used by persons to assemble for consumption of food or drink shall not exceed the occupant load as determined by dividing the net floor area or space assigned to that use by the square feet per occupant as follows:

Any individual single family dwelling or any unit in a multi-family dwelling or apartment house, fifteen (15) net square feet per person;

A public space associated with a single family dwelling or any multi-family dwelling or apartment house, fifteen (15) net square feet per person.

Penalty. If any person in control or possession of a building or structure, or portion of it, fails to comply with the provisions of this section, the assembly shall be reduced to the limit set forth by this section and the person in control or possession of a building or structure shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and fined an amount not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense with notice of the offense sent by certified mail to the owner of the building or structure. The fine shall double for the second offense and triple for the third offense with all notices of the offenses sent to the owner of the building by certified mail. In the event there are more than three (3) offenses at a building or structure, the owner shall also be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and fined an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 219, § 1.